District of Columbia statutes.
50-1213

Fee for releasing liens.

Notwithstanding the provisions of § 50-1212, there shall be a fee of $.50 for recording the release of a lien which is recorded under the provisions of this chapter, prior to June 19, 1948, and no assignment of which is recorded under the provisions of this chapter after June 19, 1948.

History

June 19, 1948, 62 Stat. 493, ch. 522, § 2

Cross References

Recorder of deeds, fee rate adjustments, see § 42-1218.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 42-1218.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-1013.
1973 Ed., § 40-712a.